Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1395.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 322 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 322. Eligibility; Incompatible Offices.--(a) Any [citizen] resident of this Commonwealth, having a good moral character, being eighteen (18) years of age or upwards, and having been a resident of the district for at least one (1) year prior to the date of his election or appointment, shall be eligible to the office of school director therein: Provided, That any person holding any office or position of profit under the government of any city of the first class, or the office of mayor, chief burgess, county commissioner, district attorney, 1234567891011121314151617181920 city, borough, or township treasurer, member of council in any municipality, township commissioner, township supervisor, tax collector, assessor, assistant assessor, any comptroller, auditor, constable, executive director or assistant executive director of an intermediate unit, supervisor, principal, teacher, or employe of any school district, shall not be eligible as a school director in this Commonwealth[. This] and shall not be eligible to serve as a school director of a school district in which an immediate family member is currently employed.(b) Subject to subsection (c), this section shall not [prevent any] be construed to prevent an individual who is a district superintendent, assistant district superintendent, supervisor, teacher, or employe of any school district, from being a school director in a district other than the one in which [he] the individual is so employed, and other than in a district with which the district in which [he] the individual is employed operates a joint school or department. [Provided, however, That a joint school or department does not include a career and technical school, intermediate unit or community college: And provided further, That a](c) A school director who is a supervisor, principal, teacher or employe of a career and technical school, intermediate unit or community college shall not:(1) serve as a member of a board of the career and technical school, intermediate unit or community college in which [he] the school director is a supervisor, principal, teacher or employe[: And provided further, That a school director who is a supervisor, principal, teacher or employe of a career and technical school, intermediate unit or community college, shall 20250HB1395PN1590 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not]; or(2) be assigned to a position of employment under the supervision of the district in which [he or she] the school director serves as a member of the board of school directors.(d) A school director shall not be eligible to the office of member of council in [any] a municipality.(e) As used in this section:"Immediate family member" shall mean an individual's parent, sibling, spouse, child, stepchild, grandchild, nephew, niece, first cousin, sister-in-law, brother-in-law, uncle or aunt."Joint school or department" does not include an area career and technical school, intermediate unit or community college.Section 2. This act shall apply only to individuals who are elected or appointed as school directors on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1395PN1590 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516